Illinois, session 104th, HB827.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Gas Revenue Tax Act is amended by changing 5Section 15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 615/15)  (from Ch. 120, par. 467.30)7    Sec. 15. This Act may be cited as the the Gas Revenue Tax 8Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)